Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.030

Venue.

(1) Venue for a guardianship proceeding for a minor is in:

(a) The county in which the minor resides or is present at the time the proceeding commences; or

(b) The county in which another proceeding concerning the custody or parental rights of the minor is pending.

(2) Venue for a guardianship proceeding or protective arrangement instead of guardianship for an adult is in:

(a) The county in which the respondent resides;

(b) If the respondent has been admitted to an institution by court order, the county in which the court is located; or

(c) If the proceeding is for appointment of an emergency guardian for an adult, the county in which the respondent is present.

(3) Venue for a conservatorship proceeding or protective arrangement instead of conservatorship is in:

(a) The county in which the respondent resides, whether or not a guardian has been appointed in another county or other jurisdiction; or

(b) If the respondent does not reside in this state, in any county in which property of the respondent is located.

(4) If proceedings under this chapter are brought in more than one county, the court of the county in which the first proceeding is brought has the exclusive right to proceed unless the court determines venue is properly in another court or the interest of justice otherwise requires transfer of the proceeding.

[ 2019 c 437 s 106.]